fi: Koti ja puutarha > Keittiö ja ruokailu > Keittiövälineet ja tarvikkeet > Keittiösäilytys: Säilyketelineet; Juoma-astiatelineet; Keittiökaappien säilytysratkaisut; Keittiön työtasojen säilytysratkaisut; Keittiötarviketelineet ja -hyllyt; Veitsitukit ja -telineet; Servettitelineet ja -automaatit; Talouspaperirullatelineet ja -automaatit; Pannutelineet; Maustetelineet; Pillitelineet ja -automaatit; Sokeriastiat; Hammastikkutelineet ja -automaatit; Keittiö- ja ruokailuväline­laatikot
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Κουζίνα & τραπεζαρία > Εργαλεία & σκεύη κουζίνας > Οργανωτές κουζίνας: Οργανωτές κονσερβών; Βάσεις ποτηριών; Οργανωτές ντουλαπιών κουζίνας; Οργάνωση πάγκων κουζίνας & σταθμών ποτών; Θήκες & ράφια εργαλείων κουζίνας; Θήκες & βάσεις μαχαιριών; Θήκες & διανομείς χαρτοπετσετών; Θήκες & διανομείς πετσετών; Ράφια κατσαρολών; Οργανωτές μπαχαρικών; Θήκες & διανομείς καλαμακιών; Θήκες ζάχαρης; Θήκες & διανομείς οδοντογλυφίδων; Δίσκοι εργαλείων & μαχαιροπίρουνων
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Kuhinja i blagovaonica > Kuhinjski alati i pribor > Kuhinjski organizatori: Organizatori za limenke; Držači za čaše; Organizatori za kuhinjske ormariće; Organizatori za kuhinjski pult i šank; Držači i stalci za kuhinjski pribor; Blokovi i držači za noževe; Držači i dozatori za salvete; Držači i dozatori za papirnate ručnike; Stalci za lonce; Organizatori za začine; Držači i dozatori za slamke; Kutijice za šećer; Držači i dozatori za čačkalice; Pladnjevi za pribor za kuhanje i jelo
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Кухня и трапезария > Кухненски инструменти и прибори > Кухненски органайзери: Органайзери за консервени кутии; Поставки за съдове за напитки; Органайзери за кухненски шкафове; Органайзери за кухненски плотове и станции за напитки; Поставки и стойки за кухненски прибори; Стойки и поставки за ножове; Поставки и диспенсъри за салфетки; Поставки и диспенсъри за кухненска хартия; Закачалки за кухненски съдове; Органайзери за подправки; Поставки и диспенсъри за сламки; Органайзери за захар; Поставки и диспенсъри за клечки за зъби; Тави за прибори и прибори за хранене
en: Home & Garden > Kitchen & Dining > Kitchen Tools & Utensils > Kitchen Organizers: Can Organizers; Drinkware Holders; Kitchen Cabinet Organizers; Kitchen Counter & Beverage Station Organizers; Kitchen Utensil Holders & Racks; Knife Blocks & Holders; Napkin Holders & Dispensers; Paper Towel Holders & Dispensers; Pot Racks; Spice Organizers; Straw Holders & Dispensers; Sugar Caddies; Toothpick Holders & Dispensers; Utensil & Flatware Trays
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 厨房/餐厅 > 厨房工具/用具 > 厨房收纳器具: 罐头收纳用品; 杯具架; 橱柜整理收纳用品; 厨房置物架; 厨房用具支架/置物架; 刀座和刀架; 餐巾纸收纳; 纸巾架/盒; 锅架; 调味瓶架; 吸管收纳; 糖盒; 牙签筒/牙签盒; 器具/餐具托盘
fr: Maison et jardin > Arts de la table et arts culinaires > Ustensiles et accessoires de cuisine > Rangements de cuisine: Range-canettes; Rangements pour articles de boisson; Aménagements intérieurs pour meubles de cuisine; Rangements pour comptoirs de cuisine et bars; Range-ustensiles pour la cuisine; Blocs à couteaux; Distributeurs et porte-serviette de table; Distributeurs de papier essuie-tout; Supports à casseroles; Étagères à épices; Distributeurs de pailles; Présentoirs à sucre; Supports et distributeurs de cure-dents; Tiroirs à couverts et ustensiles
cs: Dům a zahrada > Kuchyně a jídelny > Kuchyňské nástroje a vybavení > Kuchyňské pořadače: Organizéry na plechovky; Regály na skleničky; Organizéry do kuchyňské linky; Organizéry na kuchyňské desky a pulty; Držáky a přihrádky na kuchyňské potřeby; Bloky a stojany na nože; Držáky a zásobníky na ubrousky; Držáky a zásobníky papírových utěrek; Police na hrnce; Sady kořenek; Držáky a zásobníky na brčka; Dózy na cukr; Stojany a dávkovače na párátka; Zásuvky na nádobí a příbory
ru: Дом и сад > Кухня и сервировка стола > Кухонная утварь > Кухонные органайзеры: Органайзеры для банок; Держатели для посуды для напитков; Органайзеры для кухонных шкафов; Органайзеры для столешниц и зон приготовления напитков; Подставки и настенные органайзеры для кухонной утвари; Подставки и держатели для ножей; Подставки и диспенсеры для салфеток; Держатели и диспенсеры для бумажных полотенец; Навесные полки для кастрюль и сковород; Органайзеры для специй; Подставки и диспенсеры для соломинок; Подставки для пакетиков с сахаром; Подставки и диспенсеры для зубочисток; Лотки для столовых приборов и кухонной утвари
sv: Hem och trädgård > Kök och matsal > Köksverktyg och köksgeråd > Köksorganiserare: Burkorganiserare; Ställ för dryckeskärl; Organiserare för köksskåp; Snurror för köksförvaring; Hållare för köksgeråd; Knivblock och knivhållare; Servetthållare och servettautomater; Hållare och automater för pappershanddukar; Kastrullställ; Kryddsorterare; Sugrörshållare och automater; Behållare för sockerpaket; Hållare och automater för tandpetare; Brickor för tallrikar och bestick
nb: Hjem og hage > Kjøkken og spiserom > Kjøkkenverktøy og bestikk > Kjøkkenorganisering: Boksorganisering; Drikkeholdere; Kjøkkenskapsorganisering; Organisering av kjøkkenbenker og drikkestasjoner; Holdere og stativere for kjøkkenutstyr; Knivblokker og -holdere; Serviettholdere og -dispensere; Holdere og dispensere for papirhåndklær; Kjelestativer; Krydderorganisering; Holdere og dispensere for sugerør; Sukkerholdere; Holdere og dispensere for tannpirkere; Bestikkbrett
de: Heim & Garten > Küche & Esszimmer > Küchenhelfer & -utensilien > Küchenorganizer: Konservenregal; Trinkgefäßhalter; Küchenschranksysteme; Organizer für Küchenutensilien; Halter & Regale für Küchenutensilien; Messerblöcke & -halter; Serviettenhalter & -spender; Küchenrollenhalter & -spender; Topfregale; Gewürzregale & -ständer; Trinkhalmhalter & -spender; Zuckertütenhalter; Zahnstocherbehälter & -spender; Besteckkästen & -schubladen
hu: Otthon és kert > Konyha és étkező > Konyhai eszközök és edények > Konyhaszervezők: Konzervrendezők; Italtartók; Konyhaszekrény-szervezők; Konyhaipult- és italállomás-szervezők; Konyhai edénytartók és állványok; Késblokkok és -tartók; Szalvétatartók és -adagolók; Papírtörlőtartók és -adagolók; Fazéktartók; Fűszerszervezők; Szívószáltartók és -adagolók; Cukortartók; Fogpiszkálótartók és -adagolók; Edény- és evőeszköztálcák
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 주방/식탁 > 주방용품 > 주방 정리용품: 캔 보관함; 컵 보관대; 찬장 정리 용품; 주방 조리대/음료대 정리용품; 조리기구 보관통/걸이; 칼꽂이/홀더; 냅킨 통/디스펜서; 종이 타월 홀더/디스펜서; 냄비걸이; 양념 정리함; 빨대통/디스펜서; 설탕 케이스; 이쑤시개 통/디스펜서; 조리기구/식기 트레이
da: Hjem og have > Køkken og spisestue > Køkkenredskaber > Køkkenopbevaring: Dåseopbevaring; Holdere til drikkeservice; Køkkenskabsopbevaring; Opbevaringssystemer til køkkenremedier; Holdere og stativer til køkkenredskaber; Knivblokke og -holdere; Servietholdere; Køkkenrulleholdere og -dispensere; Grydeophæng; Krydderihylder; Holdere til sugerør; Sukkerbeholdere; Tandstikholdere; Bestikbakker
nl: Huis en tuin > Keuken en eetkamer > Keukengereedschap > Keukenopbergsystemen: Opbergsystemen voor blikken; Glazenrekken; Opbergsystemen voor keukenkasten; Aanrecht- en barorganizers; Houders en rekken voor keukenbenodigdheden; Messenblokken en messenhouders; Servettenhouders en -dispensers; Keukenpapierhouders en -dispensers; Pannenrekken; Kruidenrekjes; Rietjeshouders en dispensers; Suikerbewaardozen; Tandenstokerhouders; Bestekbakken
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Bucătărie și sufragerie > Instrumente și ustensile de bucătărie > Organizatoare pentru bucătărie: Organizatoare pentru conserve; Suporturi pentru articole de băut; Organizatoare pentru dulapuri de bucătărie; Organizatoare pentru blat și pentru bar; Vase și suporturi pentru ustensile de bucătărie; Blocuri și suporturi pentru cuțite; Suporturi și cutii pentru șervețele; Suporturi și dozatoare pentru prosoape de hârtie; Suporturi pentru oale; Organizatoare pentru condimente; Suporturi și dozatoare pentru paie; Cutii pentru zahăr; Suporturi și dozatoare pentru scobitori; Tăvi pentru ustensile și tacâmuri
it: Casa e giardino > Cucina e pranzo > Strumenti e utensili cucina > Armadi da cucina: Organizzatori per lattine; Espositori per bottiglie; Organizzatori per armadi da cucina; Organizer per cucina e angolo bar; Contenitori e supporti per utensili da cucina; Blocchi e portacoltelli; Portatovaglioli e distributori; Portatovaglioli di carta e distributori; Portapentole; Portaspezie; Portacannucce e dispenser; Contenitori per bustine di zucchero; Portastuzzicadenti ed erogatori; Vassoi utensili e posate
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Kuhinja in jedilnica > Kuhinjska orodja in pripomočki > Kuhinjski organizatorji: Organizatorji pločevink; Držala za pijačo; Organizatorji za kuhinjske omarice; Organizatorji kuhinjskih pultov in postaj za pijače; Držala in stojala za kuhinjske pripomočke; Bloki in držala za nože; Držala in podajalniki za prtičke; Držala in podajalniki za papirnate brisače; Stojala za lonce; Organizatorji začimb; Držala in podajalniki za slamice; Posodice za sladkor; Držala in podajalniki za zobotrebce; Podstavki za pripomočke in jedilni pribor
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Virtuvė ir valgomasis > Virtuvės įrankiai > Virtuvės reikmenų dėklai: Skardinių dėklai; Gėrimų indų laikikliai; Virtuvės spintelių dėklai; Virtuvės darbastalio ir gėrimų zonos dėklai; Virtuvės reikmenų laikikliai ir lentynos; Peilių blokai ir laikikliai; Servetėlių laikikliai ir dalytuvai; Popierinių rankšluosčių laikikliai ir dalytuvai; Puodų lentynos; Prieskonių dėklai; Šiaudelių laikikliai ir dalytuvai; Cukraus dėklai; Dantų krapštukų laikikliai ir dalytuvai; Maisto gaminimo ir stalo įrankių padėklai
th: บ้านและสวน > ห้องครัวและการรับประทานอาหาร > เครื่องมือและเครื่องใช้ในครัว > ตู้เก็บเครื่องครัว: ที่จัดระเบียบกระป๋อง; ที่ใส่แก้วน้ำ; ที่จัดระเบียบสำหรับตู้ครัว; เคาน์เตอร์ครัวและที่จัดระเบียบส่วนเครื่องดื่ม; ที่ใส่และชั้นสำหรับอุปกรณ์ในครัว; บล็อกและที่ใส่มีด; ที่ใส่และที่จ่ายกระดาษเช็ดปาก; กล่องใส่และจ่ายกระดาษทิชชู่; ชั้นวางหม้อ; ที่จัดระเบียบเครื่องเทศ; ที่เก็บและจ่ายหลอด; ที่ใส่น้ำตาล; ที่ใส่และที่จ่ายไม้จิ้มฟัน; ถาดเก็บช้อนส้อม
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Cozinha e refeições > Ferramentas e utensílios de cozinha > Organizadores para cozinha: Organizadores para latas; Suportes para copos/chávenas; Organizadores para armários da cozinha; Organizadores para balcão de cozinha e zona de bebidas; Suportes e prateleiras de utensílios de cozinha; Blocos e suportes de facas; Suportes e dispensadores de guardanapos; Suportes e dispensadores de rolos de papel; Prateleiras para panelas; Organizadores para especiarias; Suportes e dispensadores de palhas; Suportes para pacotes de açúcar; Suportes e dispensadores para palitos; Tabuleiros para utensílios e talheres
es: Casa y jardín > Cocina y comedor > Herramientas y utensilios de cocina > Organizadores de cocina: Organizadores de latas; Estanterías para cristalería; Organizadores de armarios de cocina; Encimeras y organizadores de bebidas; Contenedores para utensilios de cocina; Portacuchillos y bloques para cuchillos; Servilleteros y dispensadores de servilletas; Dispensadores y soportes de papel de cocina; Soportes para sartenes; Especieros; Dispensadores y soportes de pajitas; Recipientes para azucarillos; Palilleros y dispensadores de palillos; Bandejas de cubiertos y utensilios
pl: Dom i ogród > Kuchnia i jadalnia > Narzędzia i sprzęty kuchenne > Organizery kuchenne: Organizery na puszki; Regały na napoje; Organizery do szaf kuchennych; Kuchenne organizery nablatowe i dystrybutory do napojów; Pojemniki na sztućce; Stojaki i uchwyty na noże; Serwetniki; Uchwyty i dozowniki na ręczniki papierowe; Wieszaki na garnki; Pudełka na przyprawy; Pojemniki na słomki; Pojemniki na cukier; Pojemniki i dozowniki na wykałaczki; Wkłady na sztućce
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > キッチン・ダイニング > キッチン用品・調理器具 > キッチン収納用品: 缶詰収納用品; グラス・カップ収納; キッチン引き出し収納用品; キッチンオーガナイザー; 調理器具収納; 包丁立て; ナプキン立て; ペーパータオルホルダー・ディスペンサー; 鍋・フライパン収納; スパイスラック; ストロー立て; スティックシュガー入れ; ようじ立て; 調理器具・カトラリー収納
vi: Nhà và vườn > Phòng bếp và phòng ăn > Dụng cụ nhà bếp > Kệ bếp: Chia ngăn đựng can; Giá để ly tách; Chia ngăn tủ bếp; Đồ dùng sắp xếp kệ bếp & quầy đồ uống; Kệ và giá giữ dụng cụ nhà bếp; Hộp và giá đựng dao; Hộp đựng giấy ăn; Hộp & Giá treo khăn giấy; Giá treo nồi xoong; Khay/ ngăn đựng gia vị; Thiết bị đựng và nhả ống hút; Hộp đựng đường; Hộp tăm; Khay đựng dụng cụ bếp và bàn ăn
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Produtos de cozinha e aparelhos de jantar > Ferramentas e utensílios de cozinha > Organizadores para cozinha: Organizadores de latas; Prateleiras para utensílios para bebidas; Organizadores para armários de cozinha; Organizadores para utensílios de cozinha e bebidas; Prateleiras e suportes para utensílios de cozinha; Suportes e porta-facas; Porta-guardanapos; Suportes para toalhas de papel; Armários para panelas; Porta-temperos; Porta-canudos; Porta-açúcar; Paliteiros; Bandejas para utensílios e louça rasa
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Kuchyňa a jedáleň > Kuchynské náradie a riad > Kuchynské organizéry: Organizéry na plechovky; Držiaky na nápoje; Organizéry do kuchynských skriniek; Organizéry na kuchynské pulty a nápojové stanice; Držiaky a stojany na kuchynský riad; Bloky a držiaky na nože; Držiaky a zásobníky na obrúsky; Držiaky a zásobníky na papierové utierky; Stojany na hrnce; Organizéry na korenie; Držiaky a zásobníky na slamky; Nádoby na balený cukor; Držiaky a zásobníky na špáradlá; Tácky na riad a príbory
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 廚房與餐廳 > 廚房工具和用具 > 廚房收納用品: 多層罐頭置物架; 杯壺放置架; 廚房櫥櫃內架; 廚房工作台/茶水區收納用品; 廚房用具架; 刀具架; 餐巾盒/分配器; 紙巾架; 鍋架; 香料存放櫃/架; 吸管收納盒/筒; 糖包座; 牙籤筒/罐; 餐具收納盤
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Mutfak ve Yemek > Mutfak Gereçleri ve Aletleri > Mutfak Düzenleyicileri: Konserve Kutusu Düzenleyicileri; Bardak Rafları; Mutfak Dolabı Düzenleyicileri; Mutfak Tezgahı ve İçecek İstasyonu Düzenleyicileri; Mutfak Gereci Askıları ve Rafları; Bıçak Kütükleri ve Askıları; Peçetelik ve Peçete Dispenserleri; Havlu Peçetelik ve Havlu Peçete Dispenserleri; Tencere Tava Askıları; Baharatlıklar; Pipet Kutu ve Dispenserleri; Şeker Kutuları; Kürdanlık ve Dispenserleri; Araçlar ve Çatal Kaşıklık